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DTC P2 120/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”D”
Circuit

DTC P2 122/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ’D”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P2 123/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ’D”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 125/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”E”
Circuit

DTC P2 127/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”E”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P2 128/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ’E”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 138/19[Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch
”D”/”E” Voltage Correlation

HINT:

This is the repair procedure for the "accelerator pedal position sensor”.
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

A vehicle that is equipped with an Electronic Throttle Control System (ETCS) does not have a throttle cable.

The APP sensor is mounted on the accelerator pedal bracket. The APP sensor has 2 sensor elements/signal
outputs: VPA 1 andVPA2.VPA 1 isusedtodetectthe actual accelerator pedal angle (used for engine control)

and VPA2is usedto detect malfunctionsin VPA 1.Voltage appliedtoVPA 1 andVPA2changesbetween0.2
V and 5 V in proportion to the accelerator pedal angle.

1 and VPA2 signal outputs, and con-

The engine control ECU monitors the accelerator pedal angle from VPA

trols the throttle actuator based on these signals.

\
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Accelerator Pedal Position (APP)

A22008

DTC Detection Condition .
DTC No. . . o Main trouble Area
(Open or short in accelerator pedal position sensor circuit)
Condition (a) continues for 0.5 seconds or more: .
. . .  Accelerator pedal position sensor
P2120/19 (1 tripdetectionlogic) .
* Engine control ECU
(@)VPA = 0.2VandVPA2 = 0.97deg,orVPA = 4.8V
Condition (a) and (b) continues for 0.5 seconds or more: * Accelerator pedal position sensor
(1 tripdetectionlogic) *VCPAcircuitopen
P2122/19 P—
(a)VPA = 0.2V «\VPA circuitopen orground short
(b) VPA2 = 0.97 deg * Engine control ECU
Condition (a) continues for 2.0 seconds or more:  Accelerator pedal position sensor
P2123/19 (1 tripdetectionlogic) * EPAcircuitopen
(a)VPA = 4.8V * Engine control ECU
Condition (a) continues for 0.5 seconds or more:
P2125/19 (1 trip detectionlogic)  Accelerator pedal position sensor
(@ VPA2 = 0.5VandVPA = 0.97deg,orVPA2 = 4.8Vanfl <EnginecontrolECU
0.2V = VPA = 345V
Condition (a) and (b) continues for 0.5 seconds or more: « Accelerator pedal position sensor
1 trip detectionlogic «VCP2circuitopen
P2127/19 (1 trip gic) L P
(a)VPA2 = 0.5V *VPA2 circuitopen or ground short
(b) VPA = 0.97deg * Engine control ECU
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Condition (a) and (b) continues for 2.0 seconds or more: .
. ) )  Accelerator pedal position sensor
P2128/19 (1 tripdetection logic) EPAcircuitopen
. | I
(@) VPA2 = 4.8V e Y thECU
» Engine contr
(2)0.2V = VPA = 3.45V ginecontro
Condition (a) or (b) continues for 2.0 seconds or more: . L
. ) . *VPAand VPA2 circuitare short circuited
P2138/19 (1 trip detectionlogic) Accelerat dal "
« Accelerator pedal position sensor
(@) [VPA —VPA2| < 0.02V i thECE
(b)VPA = 0.2VandVPA2 = 05V nginecontro
HINT:

AfterconfirmingDTCP2 120,P2 122,P2 123,P2 125,P2 127,P2 128andP2 138usethehand -heldtester
to confirm the accelerator pedal opening percentage.

Accelerator pedal position expressed as voltage
Trauhlearea Accelerator pedal completely released Accelerator pedal fully depressed
ACCELPOS# 1 ACCELPOS#2 ACCELPOS# 1 ACCELPOS#2
VC circuit open 0to 0.2V 0to 0.2V 0to 0.2V 0to 0.2V
VPA circuit open or ground short 0to 0.2V 1.2t02.0V 0to 0.2V 341053V
VPA2 circuit open or ground short 0.5t0 1.1V 0to0.2V 26t045V 0to0.2V
E2 circuit open 451055V 45t055V 451055V 451055V

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

When VPA or VPA2, deviates from the standard, or the difference between the voltage outputs of the two
sensors is less than threshold, the engine control ECU concludes that there is a defect in the accelerator
pedal position sensor. The engine control ECU turns on the MIL and a DTC is set.

Example:

When the voltage output of the VPA below 0.2 V or exceeds 4.8 V.

The monitor runs for 2 seconds (the first 2 seconds for engine idle) after the engine is started.

FAIL SAFE

The accelerator pedal position sensor has two (main and sub) sensor circuits. If a malfunction occurs in ei-
ther of the sensor circuits, the engine control ECU detects the abnormal signal voltage difference between
the two sensor circuits and switches to limp mode. In limp mode, the remaining circuit is used to calculate
the accelerator pedal opening to allow the vehicle to continue driving.

If both circuits malfunction, the engine control ECU regards the opening angle of the accelerator pedal to
be fully closed.

In this case, the throttle valve will remain closed as if the engine is idling.
Ifa”pass” conditionis detected and thenthe ignition switchisturned OFF, the fail
and the system will return to normal condition.

-safe operation will stop

2UZ-FEENGINESUP (RM 1113E)
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

Readfreeze frame data usingthe hand

-heldtester. Freeze frame datarecords the engine conditions when

a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuel ratiowaslean orrich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

sensor data.

1 Connecthand -heldtester, and read the voltage for accelerator pedal position

Depressed Released

FI7052

e ]

2UZ-FEENGINESUP (RM 1113E)

PREPARATION:
(@) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtes-

ter main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD /
DATALIST/ETCS/ACCELPOS# 1and ACCELPOS#2.
CHECK:
Readthe voltage forthe accelerator pedal position sensor data.
OK:

Accelerator pedal ACCELPOS# 1 ACCEL POS #2
Released 0.5t0 1.1V 1.2t02.0V
Depressed 26to45V 341053V

0K> Go to step 5.
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2 | Check accelerator pedal position sensor.

A21964

OK

(a) Disconnect the accelerator pedal position sensor con-
nector.

CHECK:

(@) Measure the resistance between each terminal.

OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition
1.510 6.0 kQ at 20_C (68_F)

1.510 6.0 kQ at 20_C (68_F)

3-6

1-4

NG Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

3 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector in VCPA, VCP2, VPA, VPA2
EPA and EPAZ2 circuit between engine control ECU and accelerator pedal posi-

tion sensor.

Wire Harness Side:

Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor

A21965

L 1l
vpa2 — SR
. EPA2 — /
Engine Control ECU (
VCP2

Connector

VPA EPA

VCPA A21033

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the Al17 accelerator pedal position sensor
connector.

(b) Disconnect the E11 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.

OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition

VPA1 (A17-5) - VPA (E11-22) Below 1 Q

EP1 (A17-3) - EPA (E11-28) Below 1 Q
VCP1 (A17-6) - VCPA (E11-26) Below 1 Q
VPA2 (A17-2) - VPA2 (E11-23) Below 1 Q

EP2 (A17-1) - EPA2 (E11-29) Below 1 Q
VCP2 (A17-4) - VCP2 (E11-27) Below 1 Q

VPAL (A17-5) or VPA (E11-22) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

EP1 (A17-3) or EPA (E11-28) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

VCP1 (A17-6) or VCPA (E11-26) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

VPA2 (A17-2) or VPA2 (E11-23) - 10 kQ or higher

Body ground
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EP2 (A17-1) or EPA2 (E11-29) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

VCP2 (A17-4) or VCP2 (E11-27) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 | Check voltage between terminals VCPA and EPA, and VCP2 and EPA2 of engine
control ECU terminals.

PREPARATION:

EPA(-)  VCPA(+)

(@) Turn the ignition switch ON.
N\ @\ (b) Disconnect the Al17 accelerator pedal position sensor
=R R TEECERT) connector.

’!}lllll \

I EEEN A0 10 ] il
HHHHH — | e R CHECK:
4 W) 11 \EREEE] [NRE) t '] LX. . .
\\u\—_( Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E11
M engine control ECU connector.
EPA2 () vep2 (4| 2K
P A19521 Tester Connection Specified Condition
VCPA (E11-26) - EPA (E11-28) 451055V
VCP2 (E11-27) - EPA2 (E11-29) 451055V

RM630, page FI-74).

NG> Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
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5 [Check if DTC output recur?

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Disconnect the battery terminals or remove the EFIl or ECD No. 1 fuse and ETCS fuse (Clear DTCs).
(c) Start the engine.
(d) Drive the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Read the DTC output.
OK:
No DTC output.

@

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).

OK> System is OK.
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